latvian.utf8.aff
#compoundwords off
#allaffixes off
#
#defstringtype "latin7" "TeX" ".latin7"
#
#wordchars a A
#stringchar ā Ā
#wordchars [bc] [BC]
#stringchar č Č
#wordchars [de] [DE]
#stringchar ē Ē
#wordchars [fg] [FG]
#stringchar ģ Ģ
#wordchars [hi] [HI]
#stringchar ī Ī
#wordchars [jk] [JK]
#stringchar ķ Ķ
#wordchars l L
#stringchar ļ Ļ
#wordchars [mnoprs] [mnoprs]
#stringchar š Š
#wordchars [tu] [TU]
#stringchar ū Ū
#wordchars [vz] [VZ]
#stringchar ž Ž

prefixes

flag A:
   .    > NE

suffixes

flag *B:
   [^SZ]T    > -T,ŠU
   [^SZ]T    > -T,SI
   [^SZ]T    > -T,S
   [^SZ]T    > -T,SIM
   [^SZ]T    > -T,SIET
   [^SZ]T    > -T,SIT
   [^SZ]T    > -T,ŠOT     #atst izt.v.nak
   [S]T    > -ST,TĪŠU
   [S]T    > -ST,TĪSI
   [S]T    > -ST,TĪS
   [S]T    > -ST,TĪSIM
   [S]T    > -ST,TĪSIET
   [S]T    > -ST,TĪSIT
   [S]T    > -ST,TĪŠOT     #atst izt.v.nak
   [Z]T    > -T,ĪŠU
   [Z]T    > -T,ĪSI
   [Z]T    > -T,ĪS
   [Z]T    > -T,ĪSIM
   [Z]T    > -T,ĪSIET
   [Z]T    > -T,ĪSIT
   [Z]T    > -T,ĪŠOT     #atst izt.v.nak

flag *F:
   [S]T    > -T,ĪŠU
   [S]T    > -T,ĪSI
   [S]T    > -T,ĪS
   [S]T    > -T,ĪSIM
   [S]T    > -T,ĪSIET
   [S]T    > -T,ĪSIT
   [S]T    > -T,ĪŠOT     #atst izt.v.nak

flag *E:
   [S]T    > -ST,DĪŠU
   [S]T    > -ST,DĪSI
   [S]T    > -ST,DĪS
   [S]T    > -ST,DĪSIM
   [S]T    > -ST,DĪSIET
   [S]T    > -ST,DĪSIT
   [S]T    > -ST,DĪŠOT    #atst izt.v.nak
   [S]T    > -ST,DU     #pagĀtne
   [S]T    > -ST,DI
   [S]T    > -ST,DA
   [S]T    > -ST,DĀM
   [S]T    > -ST,DĀT
   [S]T    > -ST,DIS
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠA
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠAM
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠU
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠĀ
   [S]T    > -ST,DUSI
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠAS
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠAI
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠI
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠIEM
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠUS
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠOS
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠĀM
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠĀS
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠAIS
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠAJAM
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠO
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠAJĀ
   [S]T    > -ST,DUSĪ
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠAJAI
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠIE
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠAJIEM
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠAJOS
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠAJĀM
   [S]T    > -ST,DUŠAJĀS

flag *4:
   [^ĪŪ]T    > -T,U
   [^ĪŪ]T    > -T,I
   [^ĪŪ]T    > -T,A
   [^ĪŪ]T    > -T,ĀM
   [^ĪŪ]T    > -T,ĀT
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INU
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INI
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INA
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INĀM
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INĀT
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVU
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVI
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVA
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVĀM
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVĀT

flag *5:
   [G]T    > -GT,DZU
   [G]T    > -GT,DZI
   [G]T    > -GT,DZA
   [G]T    > -GT,DZĀM
   [G]T    > -GT,DZĀT
   [K]T    > -KT,CU
   [K]T    > -KT,CI
   [K]T    > -KT,CA
   [K]T    > -KT,CĀM
   [K]T    > -KT,CĀT
   [S]T    > -ST,JU
   [S]T    > -ST,JI
   [S]T    > -ST,JA
   [S]T    > -ST,JĀM
   [S]T    > -ST,JĀT
   [A]UT    > -AUT,ĀVU
   [A]UT    > -AUT,ĀVI
   [A]UT    > -AUT,ĀVA
   [A]UT    > -AUT,ĀVĀM
   [A]UT    > -AUT,ĀVĀT
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,U
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,I
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,A
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,ĀM
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,ĀT
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLU
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLI
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLA
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLĀM
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLĀT
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLU
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLI
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLA
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLĀM
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLĀT
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLU
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLI
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLA
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLĀM
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLĀT
   [^AEIU]RT    > -T,U
   [^AEIU]RT    > -T,I
   [^AEIU]RT    > -T,A
   [^AEIU]RT    > -T,ĀM
   [^AEIU]RT    > -T,ĀT
   [A]RT    > -ART,ĀRU
   [A]RT    > -ART,ĀRI
   [A]RT    > -ART,ĀRA
   [A]RT    > -ART,ĀRĀM
   [A]RT    > -ART,ĀRĀT
   [E]RT    > -ERT,ĒRU
   [E]RT    > -ERT,ĒRI
   [E]RT    > -ERT,ĒRA
   [E]RT    > -ERT,ĒRĀM
   [E]RT    > -ERT,ĒRĀT
   [I]RT    > -IRT,ĪRU
   [I]RT    > -IRT,ĪRI
   [I]RT    > -IRT,ĪRA
   [I]RT    > -IRT,ĪRĀM
   [I]RT    > -IRT,ĪRĀT
   [U]RT    > -URT,ŪRU
   [U]RT    > -URT,ŪRI
   [U]RT    > -URT,ŪRA
   [U]RT    > -URT,ŪRĀM
   [U]RT    > -URT,ŪRĀT

flag *1:
   [ĀĒĪOŪ]T    > -T,JU
   [ĀĒĪOŪ]T    > -T,JI
   [ĀĒĪOŪ]T    > -T,JA
   [ĀĒĪOŪ]T    > -T,JĀM
   [ĀĒĪOŪ]T    > -T,JĀT

flag *H:
   [ĀĒĪOŪ]T    > -T,JU
   [ĀĒĪOŪ]T    > -T,
   [ĀĒĪOŪ]T    > -T,JAM
   [ĀĒĪOŪ]T    > -T,JAT
   [ĀĒĪOŪ]T    > -T,JIET
   [ĀĒĪOŪ]T    > -T,JOT

flag *G:
   [ĀĒĪOŪ]T    > -T,JAS    # IIk refl. tagadne
   [ĀĒĪOŪ]T    > -T,JAMIES
   [ĀĒĪOŪ]T    > -T,JATIES    # beigas tagadnei
   [ĀĒĪOŪ]T    > -T,JIETIES    # IIk refl. pavĒle
   [ĀĒĪOŪ]T    > -T,JOTIES    # IIk refl. atst.izt.v.tag.

flag *C:
   [^J][Ā]T    > -ĀT,U     #tag, Ip
   [^J][Ā]T    > -ĀT,I     #tag, Ip
   [^J][Ā]T    > -ĀT,A     #tag, Ip
   [^J][Ā]T    > -ĀT,ĀM     #tag, Ip
   [^J][Ā]T    > -ĀT,OT     #atst.izst.v.tag
   [^J][Ā]T    > -ĀT,IET     #pavĒle
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,U     #tag, Ip
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,I     #tag, IIp
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,     #tag, IIIp
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,AM     #tag, Ip
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,AT     #tag, IIp
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,IET     #pavĒle
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OT     #atst.izst.v.tag
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,U     #tag, Ip
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,I     #tag, IIp
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,A     #tag, IIIp
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀM     #tag, Ip
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀT     #tag, IIp
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,IET     #pavĒle
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,OT     #atst.izst.v.tag

flag *c:
   [Ā]T    > IES    #relf.nenoteiksme
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OS    #tag, Ip
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,IES    #tag, IIp
   [Ā]T    > -T,MIES    #tag, Ip
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,IETIES    #pavĒle
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OTIES    #atst.izst.v.tag
   [Ā]T    > -T,ŠOTIES    #atst.izst.v.nak
   [Ē]T    > IES    #relf.nenoteiksme ----------
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OS    #tag, Ip 
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,IES    #tag, IIp
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,AS    #tag, IIIp
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMIES    #tag, Ip.d.
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,ATIES    #tag, IIp.d
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,IETIES    #pavĒle
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OTIES    #atst.izst.v.tag
   [Ē]T    > -T,ŠOTIES    #atst.izst.v.nak ------
   [Ī]T    > IES    #relf.nenoteiksme
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,OS    #tag, Ip
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,IES    #tag, Ip
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀS    #tag, Ip
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMIES    #tag, Ip
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀTIES    #tag, Ip
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,IETIES    #
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,OTIES    #atst.izst.v.tag
   [Ī]T    > -T,ŠOTIES    #atst.izst.v.nak
   [Ā]T    > OS    #cieshamaa k.
   [Ē]T    > OS    #cieshamaa k.
   [Ī]T    > OS    #cieshamaa k.

flag *6:
   [ĀĒUBMP]T    > -T,JU
   [BMP]T    > -T,
   [ĀĒUBMP]T    > -T,J
   [ĀĒUBMP]T    > -T,JAM
   [ĀĒUBMP]T    > -T,JAT
   [ĀĒUBMP]T    > -T,JOT    #atst.izt.v.tag
   [ĀĒU]T    > -T,JIET    #pavĒle
   [BMP]T    > -T,IET    #pavĒle
   [ĀĒU]T    > -T,J
   [G]T    > -GT,DZU
   [G]T    > -GT,DZ
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAM
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAT
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOT    #atst.izt.v.tag
   [G]T    > -GT,DZIET
   [K]T    > -KT,CU
   [K]T    > -KT,C
   [K]T    > -KT,CAM
   [K]T    > -KT,CAT
   [K]T    > -KT,COT    #atst.izt.v.tag
   [K]T    > -KT,CIET
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UJU
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UJ
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UJAM
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UJAT
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UJOT    #atst.izt.v.tag
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UJIET
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žU
   [Z]T    > -T,
   [Z]T    > -ZT,ž
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAM
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAT
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOT    #atst.izt.v.tag
   [LZ]T    > -T,IET
   [L]T    > -LT,ĻU
   [L]T    > -T,
   [L]T    > -LT,Ļ
   [L]T    > -LT,ĻAM
   [L]T    > -LT,ĻAT
   [L]T    > -LT,ĻOT    #atst.izt.v.tag
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > -T,U
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > -T,
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > -T,AM
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > -T,AT
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > -T,IET
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > -T,OT
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARU
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AR  # Ā Ē speciĀlie
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAM
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAT
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROT    #atst.izt.v.tag
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARIET
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERU
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ER  # Ā Ē speciĀlie
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAM
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAT
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROT    #atst.izt.v.tag
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERIET
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠS
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠA
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠAM
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠU
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠĀ
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠAS
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠAI
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠI
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠIEM
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠUS
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠOS
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠĀM
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠĀS
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠAIS
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠAJAM
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠO
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠAJĀ
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠAJAI
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠIE
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠAJIEM
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠAJOS
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠAJĀM
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žOŠAJĀS
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMS
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMA
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMAM
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMU
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMĀ
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMAS
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMAI
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMI
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMIEM
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMUS
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMOS
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMĀM
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMĀS
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMAIS
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMAJAM
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMO
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMAJĀ
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMAJAI
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMIE
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMAJIEM
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMAJOS
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMAJĀM
   [Z]T    > -ZT,žAMAJĀS

flag *2:
   [S]T    > -ST,žU   # tagadne
   [S]T    > -ST,D
   [S]T    > -ST,ž
   [S]T    > -ST,žAM
   [S]T    > -ST,žAT
   [S]T    > -ST,žOT    #atst.izt.v.tag
   [S]T    > -ST,DIET

flag *3:
   [S]T    > -ST,ŠU
   [S]T    > -T,
   [S]T    > -ST,Š
   [S]T    > -ST,ŠAM
   [S]T    > -ST,ŠAT
   [S]T    > -ST,ŠOT    #atst.izt.v.tag

flag *7:
   [^SZ]T    > -T,STU
   [^SZ]T    > -T,STI
   [^SZ]T    > -T,ST
   [^SZ]T    > -T,STAM
   [^SZ]T    > -T,STAT
   [^SZ]T    > -T,STOT
   [^SZ]T    > -T,STIET
   [SZ]T    > I
   [SZ]T    > AM
   [SZ]T    > AT
   [SZ]T    > OT
   [SZ]T    > IET

flag *M:
   T    > -T,DAMS
   T    > -T,DAMA
   T    > -T,DAMI
   T    > -T,DAMAS

flag *N:
   [S]T    > -ST,ZDAMS
   [S]T    > -ST,ZDAMA
   [S]T    > -ST,ZDAMI
   [S]T    > -ST,ZDAMAS

#modificĒts 2006.04.06
flag *[:
   T    > -T,DAMIES
   T    > -T,DAMĀS
   [^SZ]T    > -T,ŠANOS
   [S]T    > -ST,ŠANOS
   [Z]T    > -ZT,ŠANOS


flag *]:
   [S]T    > -ST,ZDAMIES
   [S]T    > -ST,ZDAMĀS

flag *{:
   T    > -T,JUŠIES
   T    > -T,JUSIES
   T    > -T,JOŠIES
   T    > -T,JIES

#2006-08-06 - pievienots sfx -oŠies (III konj, piem.)
flag *}:
   T    > -T,UŠIES
   T    > -T,USIES
   T    > -T,OŠIES
   T    > -T,IES

flag *Z:
   T    > -T,STAMS
   T    > -T,STAMA
   T    > -T,STAMAM
   T    > -T,STAMU
   T    > -T,STAMĀ
   T    > -T,STAMAS
   T    > -T,STAMAI
   T    > -T,STAMI
   T    > -T,STAMIEM
   T    > -T,STAMUS
   T    > -T,STAMOS
   T    > -T,STAMĀM
   T    > -T,STAMĀS
   T    > -T,STAMAIS
   T    > -T,STAMAJAM
   T    > -T,STAMO
   T    > -T,STAMAJĀ
   T    > -T,STAMAJAI
   T    > -T,STAMIE
   T    > -T,STAMAJIEM
   T    > -T,STAMAJOS
   T    > -T,STAMAJĀM
   T    > -T,STAMAJĀS

flag *):
   T    > -T,JAMS
   T    > -T,JAMA
   T    > -T,JAMAM
   T    > -T,JAMU
   T    > -T,JAMĀ
   T    > -T,JAMAS
   T    > -T,JAMAI
   T    > -T,JAMI
   T    > -T,JAMIEM
   T    > -T,JAMUS
   T    > -T,JAMOS
   T    > -T,JAMĀM
   T    > -T,JAMĀS
   T    > -T,JAMAIS
   T    > -T,JAMAJAM
   T    > -T,JAMO
   T    > -T,JAMAJĀ
   T    > -T,JAMAJAI
   T    > -T,JAMIE
   T    > -T,JAMAJIEM
   T    > -T,JAMAJOS
   T    > -T,JAMAJĀM
   T    > -T,JAMAJĀS
